Maryland, session 2026, HB1144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
12–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1144*

HOUSE BILL 1144
(c) (1) “Adjusted actual income” means actual income minus:
(i) preexisting reasonable child support obligations actually paid;
(ii) except as provided in § 12–204(a)(2) of this subtitle, alimony or
maintenance obligations actually paid; and
(iii) an allowance for support for each child living in a parent’s home
to whom the parent owes a legal duty of support if the child is considered to be spending
more than [92 overnights] 25% OF THE CHILD’S OVERNIGHTS (AT LEAST 92
OVERNIGHTS) in the parent’s home in a year and not subject to the support order.
(2) For purposes of determining the amount of the allowance under
paragraph (1)(iii) of this subsection:
(i) the basic child support obligation for each additional child in the
parent’s home shall be determined in accordance with § 12–204 of this subtitle, using only
the actual income of the parent entitled to the deduction; and
(ii) the amount determined under item (i) of this paragraph shall be
multiplied by 75%.
(3) The court shall decline to award an allowance under paragraph (1) of
this subsection if the court finds, after considering the evidence and the best interest of the
child for whom support is being determined, that the application of an allowance would be
unjust or inappropriate.
(p) “Shared physical custody adjustment” means the adjustment made to a
theoretical adjusted basic child support obligation in a shared physical custody case when
a parent keeps the child or children overnight for more than 25% (at least 92 overnights),
but less than 30% (not more than 109 overnights), of the year.
12–204.
(a) (1) The basic child support obligation shall be determined in accordance
with the schedule of basic child support obligations in subsection (e) of this section. The
basic child support obligation shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their
adjusted actual incomes.
(2) (i) If one or both parents have made a request for alimony or
maintenance in the proceeding in which a child support award is sought, the court shall
decide the issue and amount of alimony or maintenance before determining the child
support obligation under these guidelines.
(ii) If the court awards alimony or maintenance, the amount of
alimony or maintenance awarded shall be considered actual income for the recipient of the

HOUSE BILL 1144 3
alimony or maintenance and shall be subtracted from the income of the payor of the alimony
or maintenance under § 12–201(c)(1)(ii) of this subtitle before the court determines the
amount of a child support award.
(3) The amount of the allowance for the support of additional children
living in a parent’s home described in § 12–201(c)(1)(iii) of this subtitle shall be subtracted
from the parent’s actual income before the court determines the amount of a child support
award.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.